District of Columbia statutes.
29-410.03

Restrictions on dispositions of assets.

(a)

Property held in trust or otherwise dedicated to a charitable purpose shall not be diverted from its purpose by a transaction described in § 29-410.01 or § 29-410.02 unless the nonprofit corporation obtains an appropriate order from the Superior Court to the extent required by and pursuant to the law of the District on cy pres or otherwise dealing with the nondiversion of charitable assets.

(b)

A person that is a member or otherwise affiliated with a charitable corporation shall not receive a direct or indirect financial benefit in connection with a disposition of assets unless the person is a charitable corporation or an unincorporated entity that has a charitable purpose. This subsection shall not apply to the receipt of reasonable compensation for services rendered.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720